Wyoming statutes. Title 19 Defense Forces and Affairs
Article 2. Emergency Services Mutual Aid

Editor's notes. —

Laws 1991, ch. 210, § 1, and Laws 1991, ch. 248, § 1, both enacted an article 2 of chapter 5 of this title. The provisions enacted by ch. 210, § 1, were redesignated as article 3 and now appear as §§

19-13-301

and

19-13-302

.

Purpose of act. —

Laws 1991, ch. 248, § 2, provides: “It is the purpose of this act to permit one (1) or more fire protection services, emergency medical care providers or local government subdivisions of this state to enter into mutual aid agreements, on the basis of mutual advantage, with one (1) or more fire protection services, emergency medical care providers or local government subdivisions of any other state or the United States in order to facilitate and coordinate efficient, cooperative firefighting efforts directed toward protection of life and property in areas transcending state boundaries that, due to geographic remoteness, population sparsity, and economic or other factors, are in need of such services.”

§ 19-13-201.
Short title.

This act shall be known and may be cited as the “Interstate Emergency Services Mutual Aid Act”.

History.

Laws 1991, ch. 248, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

19-5-201

; Laws 1998, ch. 99, § 4.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “[t]his act,” referred to in this section, see § 19-13-202(a)(vi).

§ 19-13-202.
Definitions.

As used in this act:

“Emergency medical care provider” means a local government subdivision or other entity, whether public or private, which provides emergency medical services;

“Fire protection service” means a paid or volunteer fire department, fire company or other fire suppression entity organized under the laws of this state, any party state or an agency of the government of the United States;

“Local government subdivision” means the local governmental entity, other than state government, including but not limited to incorporated towns, cities and counties;

“Mutual aid agreement” or “agreement” means an agreement, consistent with the purposes of this act, by one (1) or more fire protection services, emergency medical care providers or local government subdivisions of this state with one (1) or more fire protection services, emergency medical care providers, homeland security programs or local government subdivisions of any other state or the United States;

“Party emergency service” means a fire protection service, emergency medical care provider, homeland security program, local government subdivision or agency of the United States that is a party to a mutual aid agreement as set forth in this act;

“This act” means W.S.

19-13-201

through

19-13-210

.

History.

Laws 1991, ch. 248, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

19-5-202

; Laws 1998, ch. 99, § 3; 2005, ch. 169, § 1.

The 2005 amendment

substituted “homeland security” for “emergency management” in (a)(iv) and (a)(v), and made a stylistic change.

Laws 2005, ch. 169, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 2, 2005.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 19-13-203.
Authorization to enter agreement; general content; authority.

Any one (1) or more fire protection services, emergency medical care providers, homeland security programs or local government subdivision of this state may enter into a mutual aid agreement with any one (1) or more fire protection services, emergency medical care providers, homeland security programs or local government subdivisions of any other state or the United States to provide emergency services to the area covered by the agreement. The agreement shall be authorized and approved by the governing body of each party to the agreement that is not an agency of the United States government.

The agreement shall fully set forth the powers, rights and obligations of the parties to the agreement.

A mutual aid agreement shall grant a fire protection service, homeland security program or emergency medical care provider of this state authority to operate outside of the state and shall grant authority for a fire protection service, homeland security program or emergency medical care provider of another state or the United States to operate within this state as if the fire service, homeland security program or emergency medical care provider were organized and operated under the laws of this state.

History.

Laws 1991, ch. 248, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

19-5-203

; Laws 1998, ch. 99, § 3; 2005, ch. 169, § 1.

The 2005 amendment

substituted provisions throughout to reflect the agency name “emergency management” has been changed to “homeland security.”

Laws 2005, ch. 169, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 2, 2005.

§ 19-13-204.
Detailed content of agreement.

The agreement authorized by W.S.

19-13-203

shall specify the following:

The purpose of the agreement;

The precise organization, composition and nature of any separate legal entity created by the agreement;

The duration of the agreement;

The manner of financing the agreement and establishing and maintaining a budget therefor;

Provision for administering the agreement;

The exact chain of command or delegation of authority to be followed by party emergency services acting under the provisions of the agreement;

The manner of acquiring, holding and disposing of real and personal property used in the agreement;

The method to be employed in accomplishing the partial or complete termination of the agreement and for disposing of property upon partial or complete termination; and

The nature, extent and amount of insurance coverage for acts or omissions and delineation of each party’s responsibility for that coverage.

History.

Laws 1991, ch. 248, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

19-5-204

; Laws 1998, ch. 99, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 19-13-205.
Submission of agreement to attorney general.

Before becoming effective, the agreement shall be submitted to and receive the approval of the state attorney general.

The attorney general shall approve an agreement submitted to him under this act unless he finds that it is not in proper form, does not meet the requirements set forth in this act, or otherwise does not conform to the laws of this state. If he disapproves an agreement, he shall provide a detailed written statement to the appropriate governing bodies of the fire protection services, emergency medical care providers, homeland security programs and local government subdivisions.

If the attorney general does not disapprove an agreement within sixty (60) days after its submission to him, it is considered approved.

History.

Laws 1991, ch. 248, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

19-5-205

; Laws 1998, ch. 99, § 3; 2005, ch. 169, § 1.

The 2005 amendment

substituted “homeland security” for “emergency management” in (b)

Laws 2005, ch. 169, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 2, 2005.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in the first sentence in subsection (b), see § 19-13-202(a)(vi).

§ 19-13-206.
Filing of agreement.

Within twenty (20) days after approval by the attorney general, an agreement made pursuant to this act shall be filed in the office of:

Each clerk and recorder of each county of this state where the principal office of one (1) of the parties to the agreement is located; and

The secretary of state.

History.

Laws 1991, ch. 248, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

19-5-206

; Laws 1998, ch. 99, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

This section, formerly §

19-5-206

, was inadvertently omitted from the 1998 legislative act that renumbered chapter 5. The Legislative Service Office, pursuant to §

8-1-105

, renumbered this section as §

19-13-206

.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in the introductory language of subsection (a), see § 19-13-202(a)(vi).

§ 19-13-207.
Agreement not to relieve agency of duties.

No agreement made under this act may relieve any fire protection service, emergency medical care provider, homeland security program or local government subdivision of this state of a duty imposed upon it by law. Timely performance of a duty created by a mutual aid agreement may be offered in satisfaction of the duty.

History.

Laws 1991, ch. 248, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

19-5-207

; Laws 1998, ch. 99, § 3; 2005, ch. 169, § 1.

The 2005 amendment

substituted “homeland security” for “emergency management.”

Laws 2005, ch. 169, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 2, 2005.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in the first sentence, see § 19-13-202(a)(vi).

§ 19-13-208.
Limitation of powers.

Except for the right granted by this act to jointly exercise powers, this act does not authorize any fire protection service, emergency medical care provider, homeland security program or local government subdivision of this state to exercise a power that it is not otherwise authorized to exercise.

History.

Laws 1991, ch. 248, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

19-5-208

; Laws 1998, ch. 99, § 3; 2005, ch. 169, § 1.

The 2005 amendment

substituted “homeland security” for “emergency management.”

Laws 2005, ch. 169, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 2, 2005.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to twice in this section, see § 19-13-202(a)(vi).

§ 19-13-209.
Right of state in actions involving agreements.

In any case or controversy involving performance or interpretation of or liability under a mutual aid agreement entered into between one (1) or more fire protection services, emergency medical care providers, homeland security programs or local government subdivisions of this state and one (1) or more fire protection services, emergency medical care providers, homeland security programs or local government subdivisions of another state or of the United States, the parties to the agreement are the real parties in interest. This state may maintain an action against any fire protection service, emergency medical care provider, homeland security program or local government subdivision whose default, failure, performance or other conduct caused or contributed to a loss or liability incurred by the state.

History.

Laws 1991, ch. 248, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

19-5-209

; Laws 1998, ch. 99, § 3; 2005, ch. 169, § 1.

The 2005 amendment

substituted “homeland security” for “emergency management” three times.

Laws 2005, ch. 169, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 2, 2005.

§ 19-13-210.
Authorization to appropriate funds for purpose of agreement.

A fire protection service, emergency medical care provider, homeland security program or local government subdivision of this state may appropriate funds for and may sell, lease or otherwise supply material to any entity created for the purpose of performance of an agreement and may provide such personnel or services therefor as are within its authority to furnish.

History.

Laws 1991, ch. 248, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

19-5-210

; Laws 1998, ch. 99, § 3; 2005, ch. 169, § 1.

The 2005 amendment

substituted “homeland security” for “emergency management.”

Laws 2005, ch. 169, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 2, 2005.